Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1954.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Water Protection and Fair Utility Transition Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Access to clean, affordable water is a fundamental human need and a matter of public interest.(2) Since the enactment of 66 Pa.C.S. § 1329 (relating to valuation of acquired water and wastewater systems) through Act No. 12 of 2016, the fair market valuation mechanism has led to rapid privatization of publicly owned 1234567891011121314151617 water and wastewater systems, often resulting in significant rate increases for the residents of this Commonwealth.(3) The long-term public, environmental and economic consequences of these transactions have not been sufficiently studied nor addressed through comprehensive policy.(4) A temporary pause is necessary to protect consumers and allow the Commonwealth to develop a fair, sustainable and accountable water utility framework.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Privatization." As follows:(1) A sale, lease, transfer or conveyance of a municipality-owned or authority-owned water or wastewater system to a private, investor-owned or for-profit entity.(2) The term does not include an acquisition ordered by the commission in accordance with 66 Pa.C.S. § 529 (relating to power of commission to order acquisition of small water and sewer utilities)."Working group." The Water Utility Reform Working Group established under section 5(a).Section 4. Moratorium.(a) Prohibition.--Notwithstanding 66 Pa.C.S. § 1327 (relating to acquisition of water and sewer utilities), beginning on the effective date of this subsection, and for a period of 12 months thereafter, the privatization of a municipality-owned, county-owned or authority-owned water or wastewater system shall not be authorized, approved or executed 20250HB1954PN2462 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within this Commonwealth.(b) Applicability.--Subsection (a) applies to:(1) Finalizing an existing agreement not fully executed prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Submitting an application for acquisition approval to the commission.(3) Issuing a request for proposal or initiating a sale discussion with a private entity.(c) Nonapplicability.--Subsection (a) does not apply to:(1) An emergency transfer required to maintain public health and safety.(2) An acquisition ordered by the commission in accordance with 66 Pa.C.S. § 529 (relating to power of commission to order acquisition of small water and sewer utilities).(d) Enforcement.--An attempted action or proposal regarding privatization within the moratorium period described in subsection (a) shall be deemed null and void. The commission may not docket or consider the attempted action or proposal during the moratorium period.(e) Expiration.--Unless extended by further legislative action, the moratorium under this section shall expire 12 months after the effective date of this subsection.Section 5. Water Utility Reform Working Group.(a) Establishment.--The Water Utility Reform Working Group is established.(b) Convening of working group.--No later than 60 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Governor shall convene the working group.(c) Frequency of meetings.--The working group shall meet no 20250HB1954PN2462 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fewer than three times after the initial meeting convened in accordance with subsection (b).(d) Members.--The working group shall consist of the following:(1) The chairperson of the commission, who shall serve as the chairperson of the working group.(2) The Secretary of Environmental Protection or a designee, who shall serve as the vice chairperson of the working group.(3) One member of the majority caucus of the Senate, appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate.(4) One member of the minority caucus of the Senate, appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(5) One member of the majority caucus of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives.(6) One member of the minority caucus of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(7) A representative from the Office of Consumer Advocate.(8) A representative from AARP Pennsylvania.(9) A representative from the Pennsylvania Municipal Authorities Association.(10) A representative from the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Supervisors.(11) A representative from the Pennsylvania State Association of Boroughs.(12) A representative from a Statewide low-income advocacy organization, appointed by the Governor.20250HB1954PN2462 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) A water utility economist or rate-setting expert from academia or the nonprofit sector, appointed by the Governor.(14) A representative from an environmental advocacy group, appointed by the Governor.(15) A representative from a rural water/environmental group, appointed by the Governor.(16) A representative from the water and sewer industry, appointed by the Governor.(17) A citizen representative appointed by the Governor.(e) Report.--(1) No later than 10 months after the effective date of this subsection, the working group shall develop a comprehensive policy proposal that, at a minimum:(i) Ensures equitable rate structures.(ii) Protects public ownership.(iii) Enhances regulatory oversight.(iv) Improves transparency in utility transactions.(v) Addresses safety, security and reliability of drinking water.(2) The working group shall issue a report containing the comprehensive policy proposal described in paragraph (1), which shall be delivered to the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The commission.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee 20250HB1954PN2462 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the House of Representatives.Section 6. Repeals.(a) Repealed provisions.--The following are repealed:(1) 66 Pa.C.S. § 1329 (relating to valuation of acquired water and wastewater systems).(2) Any other provision regarding the fair market valuation of acquired water and wastewater utilities.(b) Applicability.--The repeal of the provisions specified under subsection (a) shall apply to contracts and agreements for privatization that are dated on or after the effective date of this subsection.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1954PN2462 - 6 - 12345678910111213